tables/ja-rokutenkanji.utb
noback context `["ﾋﾟ"]%space @6-36-46-6-1236-23
noback context `["ﾌﾟ"]%space @6-36-46-6-1346-23
noback context `["ﾍﾟ"]%space @6-36-46-6-12346-23
noback context `["ﾎﾟ"]%space @6-36-46-6-2346-23
noback context `["ﾏ"]%space @6-36-46-1356-23
noback context `["ﾐ"]%space @6-36-46-12356-23
noback context `["ﾑ"]%space @6-36-46-13456-23
noback context `["ﾒ"]%space @6-36-46-123456-23
noback context `["ﾓ"]%space @6-36-46-23456-23
noback context `["ﾔ"]%space @6-36-46-34-23
noback context `["ﾕ"]%space @6-36-46-346-23
noback context `["ﾖ"]%space @6-36-46-345-23
noback context `["ﾗ"]%space @6-36-46-15-23
noback context `["ﾘ"]%space @6-36-46-125-23
noback context `["ﾙ"]%space @6-36-46-145-23
noback context `["ﾚ"]%space @6-36-46-1245-23
noback context `["ﾛ"]%space @6-36-46-245-23
noback context `["ﾜ"]%space @6-36-46-3-23
noback context `["ｦ"]%space @6-36-46-35-23
noback context `["ﾝ"]%space @6-36-46-356-23
noback context `["ｱ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1-23
noback context `["ｲ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-12-23
noback context `["ｳ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-14-23
noback context `["ｴ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-124-23
noback context `["ｵ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-24-23
noback context `["ｶ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-16-23
noback context `["ｷ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-126-23
noback context `["ｸ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-146-23
noback context `["ｹ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1246-23
noback context `["ｺ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-246-23
noback context `["ｶﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-16-23
noback context `["ｷﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-126-23
noback context `["ｸﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-146-23
noback context `["ｹﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-1246-23
noback context `["ｺﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-246-23
noback context `["ｻ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-156-23
noback context `["ｼ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1256-23
noback context `["ｽ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1456-23
noback context `["ｾ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-12456-23
noback context `["ｿ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-2456-23
noback context `["ｻﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-156-23
noback context `["ｼﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-1256-23
noback context `["ｽﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-1456-23
noback context `["ｾﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-12456-23
noback context `["ｿﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-2456-23
noback context `["ﾀ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-153-23
noback context `["ﾁ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1235-23
noback context `["ﾂ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1345-23
noback context `["ﾃ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-12345-23
noback context `["ﾄ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-2345-23
noback context `["ﾀﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-135-23
noback context `["ﾁﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-1235-23
noback context `["ﾂﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-1345-23
noback context `["ﾃﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-12345-23
noback context `["ﾄﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-2345-23
noback context `["ﾅ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-13-23
noback context `["ﾆ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-123-23
noback context `["ﾇ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-134-23
noback context `["ﾈ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1234-23
noback context `["ﾉ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-234-23
noback context `["ﾊ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-136-23
noback context `["ﾋ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1236-23
noback context `["ﾌ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1346-23
noback context `["ﾍ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-12346-23
noback context `["ﾎ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-2346-23
noback context `["ﾊﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-136-23
noback context `["ﾋﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-1236-23
noback context `["ﾌﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-1346-23
noback context `["ﾍﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-12346-23
noback context `["ﾎﾞ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-5-2346-23
noback context `["ﾊﾟ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-6-136-23
noback context `["ﾋﾟ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-6-1236-23
noback context `["ﾌﾟ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-6-1346-23
noback context `["ﾍﾟ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-6-12346-23
noback context `["ﾎﾟ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-6-2346-23
noback context `["ﾏ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1356-23
noback context `["ﾐ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-12356-23
noback context `["ﾑ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-13456-23
noback context `["ﾒ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-123456-23
noback context `["ﾓ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-23456-23
noback context `["ﾔ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-34-23
noback context `["ﾕ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-346-23
noback context `["ﾖ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-345-23
noback context `["ﾗ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-15-23
noback context `["ﾘ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-125-23
noback context `["ﾙ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-145-23
noback context `["ﾚ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-1245-23
noback context `["ﾛ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-245-23
noback context `["ﾜ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-3-23
noback context `["ｦ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-35-23
noback context `["ﾝ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-356-23
noback context ["ｳｨ"]%hiragana @26-12-23
noback context ["ｳｪ"]%hiragana @26-124-23
noback context ["ｳｫ"]%hiragana @26-24-23
noback context ["ｷｬ"]%hiragana @4-16-23
noback context ["ｷｭ"]%hiragana @4-146-23
noback context ["ｷｮ"]%hiragana @4-246-23
noback context ["ｷﾞｬ"]%hiragana @45-16-23
noback context ["ｷﾞｭ"]%hiragana @45-146-23
noback context ["ｷﾞｮ"]%hiragana @45-246-23
noback context ["ｼｬ"]%hiragana @4-156-23
noback context ["ｼｭ"]%hiragana @4-1456-23
noback context ["ｼｮ"]%hiragana @4-2456-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｬ"]%hiragana @45-156-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｭ"]%hiragana @45-1456-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｮ"]%hiragana @45-2456-23
noback context ["ｼｪ"]%hiragana @4-12456-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｪ"]%hiragana @45-12456-23
noback context ["ｼｬ"]~ @4-156-23
noback context ["ｼｭ"]~ @4-1456-23
noback context ["ｼｮ"]~ @4-2456-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｬ"]~ @45-156-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｭ"]~ @45-1456-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｮ"]~ @45-2456-23
noback context ["ｼｪ"]~ @4-12456-23
noback context ["ｼﾞｪ"]~ @45-12456-23
noback context ["ﾁｬ"]%hiragana @4-135-23
noback context ["ﾁｭ"]%hiragana @4-1345-23
noback context ["ﾁｮ"]%hiragana @4-2345-23
noback context ["ﾁｪ"]%hiragana @4-12345-23
noback context ["ﾃｨ"]%hiragana @4-1235-23
noback context ["ﾃﾞｨ"]%hiragana @45-1235-23
noback context ["ﾄｩ"]%hiragana @26-1345-23
noback context ["ﾄﾞｩ"]%hiragana @256-1345-23
noback context ["ﾁｬ"]~ @4-135-23
noback context ["ﾁｭ"]~ @4-1345-23
noback context ["ﾁｮ"]~ @4-2345-23
noback context ["ﾁｪ"]~ @4-12345-23
noback context ["ﾃｨ"]~ @4-1235-23
noback context ["ﾃﾞｨ"]~ @45-1235-23
noback context ["ﾄｩ"]~ @26-1345-23
noback context ["ﾄﾞｩ"]~ @256-1345-23
noback context ["ﾆｬ"]%hiragana @4-13-23
noback context ["ﾆｭ"]%hiragana @4-134-23
noback context ["ﾆｮ"]%hiragana @4-234-23
noback context ["ﾆｬ"]~ @4-13-23
noback context ["ﾆｭ"]~ @4-134-23
noback context ["ﾆｮ"]~ @4-234-23
noback context ["ﾋｬ"]%hiragana @4-136-23
noback context ["ﾋｭ"]%hiragana @4-1346-23
noback context ["ﾋｮ"]%hiragana @4-2346-23
noback context ["ﾋｬ"]~ @4-136-23
noback context ["ﾋｭ"]~ @4-1346-23
noback context ["ﾋｮ"]~ @4-2346-23
noback context `["ﾌｧ"]~ @26-136-23
noback context ["ﾌｧ"]%hiragana @26-136-23
noback context `["ﾌｨ"]~ @26-1236-23
noback context ["ﾌｨ"]%hiragana @26-1236-23
noback context `["ﾌｫ"]~ @26-2346-23
noback context ["ﾌｫ"]%hiragana @26-2346-23
noback context `[]%hankakukatakana @6-36-46
noback context %hankakukatakana[]~ @23
noback context %hankakukatakana[]!%hankakukatakana @23
noback context !%hankakukatakana[]%hankakukatakana @6-36-46
# end Hankaku Katakana rules
